Illinois, session 104th, HB4279.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Passenger Rail Planning Act. 6    Section 5. Findings. The General Assembly finds that:7        (1) Illinois is the historic and operational hub of 8    the nation's passenger rail network, serving as the 9    national terminal for multiple passenger rail routes 10    providing vital interstate and regional connections.11        (2) The Federal Railroad Administration's Midwest 12    Regional Rail Plan (2021) identifies Illinois as the 13    center of a high-frequency intercity rail system 14    connecting major Midwestern cities and states. The Plan 15    identifies service levels on 4 routes radiating from 16    Chicago with 16 hourly to 25 hourly, plus half-hourly 17    peaks, daily departures in each direction per day.18        (3) The Midwest Regional Rail Plan also identifies 19    other routes radiating from Chicago without specifying 20    service levels.21        (4) Increasing passenger rail service frequencies 22    across all corridors and long-distance routes will 23    strengthen Illinois' economy, reduce congestion, improve   HB4279- 2 -LRB104 16936 LNS 30350 b1    sustainability, and enhance access to federal and private 2    investment.3        (5) It is, therefore, the policy of the State to 4    define and pursue an integrated high-speed and intercity 5    passenger rail network as part of the Illinois State Rail 6    Plan and to ensure that these criteria are incorporated 7    into all metropolitan, regional, and statewide 8    transportation planning processes in a manner consistent 9    with federal law and planning cycles. 10    Section 10. Establishment of target rail frequencies.11    (a) The following criteria are established for intercity 12passenger rail routes serving or originating in the State. 13This outline shall serve as official benchmarks for statewide 14rail planning, investment prioritization, and coordination 15with neighboring states, Amtrak, and other railroads.16    (b) The following corridors shall be designated as:17        (1) Hourly service routes, with trains operating on 18    pulse schedules at least once per hour, in each direction, 19    throughout the day (5 a.m. to 10 p.m.):20            (A) Chicago to Milwaukee.21            (B) Chicago to Madison to St. Paul.22            (C) Chicago to Rockford.23            (D) Chicago to East St. Louis to St. Louis to 24        Kansas City.25            (E) Chicago to Detroit to Toronto.  HB4279- 3 -LRB104 16936 LNS 30350 b1            (F) Chicago to Cleveland.2            (G) Chicago to Fort Wayne to Columbus.3            (H) Chicago to Indianapolis to Cincinnati.4            (I) Chicago to Indianapolis to Louisville to 5        Nashville to Atlanta.6            (J) Chicago to Champaign.7            (K) Chicago to the Northeast Corridor (Acela).8        (2) Every-2-hour service routes, with trains operating 9    at least once per every 2 hours, in each direction, 10    throughout the day (5 a.m. to 10 p.m.):11            (A) Chicago to Moline.12            (B) Chicago to Peoria.13            (C) Milwaukee to Green Bay (by extension of 14        Chicago to Milwaukee).15        (3) Every-4-hour service routes, with trains operating 16    at least once per every 4 hours, in each direction, 17    throughout the day (5 a.m. to 10 p.m.):18            (A) Champaign to Carbondale to Memphis (by 19        extension of Chicago to Champaign).20            (B) Rockford to East Dubuque (by extension of 21        Chicago to Rockford).22            (C) Quad Cities to Des Moines to Omaha to Denver 23        (by extension of Chicago to Moline).24            (D) Chicago to Galesburg to Quincy to Hannibal.25    (c) The Department of Transportation shall incorporate 26these aspirational service frequencies into the Illinois State   HB4279- 4 -LRB104 16936 LNS 30350 b1Rail Plan prepared under 49 U.S.C. 22705 and into the 2Long-Range Statewide Transportation Plan required under 23 3U.S.C. 135.4    (d) For each interstate corridor identified in subsection 5(b), the Department of Transportation is authorized and 6encouraged to:7        (1) nominate such corridors for inclusion in the 8    Federal Railroad Administration's Corridor Identification 9    and Development Program under 49 U.S.C. 25101; and10        (2) enter into memoranda of understanding or other 11    cooperative agreements with neighboring states under 23 12    U.S.C. 135(b)(1) and 135(c), and consistent with 23 U.S.C. 13    135(e)(3), to provide for shared data, joint investment 14    prioritization, and aligned performance measures and 15    planning schedules.16    (e) The Department of Transportation shall evaluate 17opportunities to designate and advance one or more of the 18corridors identified in subsection (b) as components of the 19National Multimodal Freight Network under 49 U.S.C. 70103, 20consistent with the national multimodal freight policy under 2149 U.S.C. 70101, where such designations would enhance 22eligibility for federal discretionary or formula funding.23    (f) The Department of Transportation shall include a 24recurring section titled "Progress Toward High-Speed and 25Intercity Passenger Rail" within each update of the Illinois 26State Rail Plan and Statewide Transportation Improvement   HB4279- 5 -LRB104 16936 LNS 30350 b1Program. That section shall summarize:2        (1) the current level of service frequency in each 3    corridor;4        (2) the gap between existing and aspirational service 5    levels;6        (3) investments, capital improvements, or service 7    agreements made toward achieving the target frequencies; 8    and9        (4) coordination with neighboring states, Amtrak, and 10    federal agencies to advance these targets.11    (g) The Department of Transportation shall transmit each 12updated Progress Toward High-Speed and Intercity Passenger 13Rail section to the Governor and the General Assembly 14concurrently with the Illinois State Rail Plan submission to 15the Federal Railroad Administration.16    (h) The Department of Transportation shall align 17submissions and project proposals with applicable federal 18selection preferences in intercity passenger rail and 19multimodal grant programs, including 49 U.S.C. 24911 20(Federal-State Partnership for Intercity Passenger Rail), 21where consistency with the Corridor Identification and 22Development Program (49 U.S.C. 25101) is favored. 23    Section 15. Metropolitan Planning Organization 24coordination.25    (a) Each Metropolitan Planning Organization established   HB4279- 6 -LRB104 16936 LNS 30350 b1under 23 U.S.C. 134 within this State shall, during each 2federally required update of its metropolitan long-range 3transportation plan or Transportation Improvement Program:4        (1) recognize the target intercity and long-distance 5    passenger rail frequencies established in Section 10;6        (2) identify relevant rail corridors within or 7    adjacent to the Metropolitan Planning Organization 8    planning area; and9        (3) include a narrative discussion of how regional 10    transportation investments can support achievement of 11    those frequency targets.12    (b) The Department of Transportation shall provide 13technical assistance, data, modeling tools, and mapping 14resources to Metropolitan Planning Organizations and regional 15councils to facilitate integration of passenger rail 16frequencies into multimodal planning. The Department of 17Transportation may enter into memoranda of understanding with 18Amtrak, neighboring state departments of transportation, or 19regional rail authorities to share data and coordinate 20planning consistent with this Act.21    (c) The Department of Transportation shall, at least once 22every 4 years and consistent with the federal planning update 23cycle, convene consultations with each Metropolitan Planning 24Organization to review passenger rail investments, identify 25opportunities to advance frequency targets, and coordinate 26applications for federal or multistate funding that support   HB4279- 7 -LRB104 16936 LNS 30350 b1those goals. 2    Section 20. Investment prioritization. The Department of 3Transportation and each Metropolitan Planning Organization 4shall, to the maximum extent practicable, consider progress 5toward the target passenger rail frequencies established in 6Section 10 when developing project prioritization criteria for 7multimodal investments, particularly those affecting rail 8capacity, terminal access, or multimodal connectivity. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 10becoming law.